Utah statutes.
16-16-1405.   Noncomplying name of foreign cooperative.
(1)  A foreign cooperative whose name does not comply with Section 16-16-111
may not obtain a certificate of authority until it adopts, for the purpose of
transacting business in this state, an alternative name that complies with
Section 16-16-111.  A foreign cooperative that adopts an alternative name
under this Subsection (1) and then obtains a certificate of authority with
that name need not also comply with Section 42-2-5.  After obtaining a
certificate of authority with an alternative name, a foreign cooperative's
business in this state shall be transacted under that name unless the foreign
cooperative is authorized under Section 42-2-5 to transact business in this
state under another name.
(2)  If a foreign cooperative authorized to transact business in this state
changes its name to one that does not comply with Section 16-16-111, it may
not thereafter transact business in this state until it complies with
Subsection (1) and obtains an amended certificate of authority.
